Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SERVICES SYSTEM Section 1. NEW SECTION . 234A.1 Definitions. For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. âCommunity resourcesâ means locally focused, strength-based programs and supports that aim to enhance family functioning and resilience, promote child development and safety, and prevent future involvement with child protective services or the juvenile justice system. 2. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human services. 3. âEarly childhood and family services districtâ or âECFS districtâ means a health and human services district utilized for the purpose of administering the ECFS system. 4. âEarly childhood and family services district advisory councilâ or âECFS district advisory councilâ means an advisory council established under section 234A.3. Senate File 2488, p. 2 5. âEarly childhood and family services district planâ or âECFS district planâ means a plan developed by the department to outline the ECFS system infrastructure of a district and the programs and services intended to be provided within that district. 6. âEarly childhood and family services state planâ or âECFS state planâ means the plan developed by the department that describes the key components of the stateâs ECFS system. 7. âEarly childhood and family services systemâ or âECFS systemâ means the system established in section 234A.2. 8. âEarly childhood and family services system fundâ or âECFS system fundâ means the fund created in section 234A.6. 9. âEarly intervention strategiesâ means services and supports designed to proactively identify and address risk factors and includes services that aim to strengthen families, promote healthy development, and reduce the likelihood of abuse or neglect by providing timely, targeted assistance to children and caregivers through the ECFS system. 10. âEvidence-basedâ means practices, programs, and policies grounded in the best available research and data, and that have been scientifically tested and shown to be effective through rigorous evaluation. 11. âFamily support servicesâ include group-based parent education and home visiting programs designed to strengthen protective factors including parenting skills, increase parental knowledge of child development, and increase family functioning and problem-solving skills. Family support services may be used as an early intervention strategy to improve birth outcomes, parental knowledge, family economic success, the home learning environment, family and child involvement with others, and coordination with other community resources. Family support services may have a specific focus on preventing child maltreatment or ensuring children are safe, healthy, and ready to succeed in school. 12. âHealth and human services districtâ means the same as defined in section 217.1. 13. âHOPES-HFI programâ means the healthy opportunities for parents to experience success â healthy families Iowa program established in section 234A.5. Senate File 2488, p. 3 14. âOngoing family and community resourcesâ means a continuum of sustained, accessible, and family-centered resources provided through the ECFS system that help families meet their needs, strengthen protective factors, and prevent child abuse and neglect. 15. âPrimary prevention strategiesâ means a comprehensive set of services and supports provided through the ECFS system that are designed to strengthen families, promote healthy child development, and prevent adverse outcomes before they occur. These activities focus on addressing the underlying social, economic, and environmental conditions that place children and families at risk, such as poverty, social isolation, and lack of access to quality early care and education. 16. âProtective factorâ means an inherent strength, resource, or capacity of a family, or a resource that helps a family thrive, buffer against stress, and reduce the likelihood of child abuse, neglect, or other poor outcome. 17. âStrength-basedâ means an approach that focuses on identifying and building upon the inherent strengths, resources, and capacities of a family to support the familyâs growth, resilience, and well-being. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 234A.2 Early childhood and family services system ââ department powers and duties. 1. An early childhood and family services system is established under the control of the department for the purposes of implementing a statewide array of primary prevention strategies, early intervention strategies, and ongoing family and community resources for families and their children under nineteen years of age. 2. The ECFS system shall be administered in a manner to maximize funding opportunities, interagency collaboration, and integration of activities and services that support positive outcomes for children and families. 3. The ECFS system shall support equitable statewide access to all services, supports, and other resources offered through the ECFS system that, at a minimum, shall include all of the following: a. Evidence-based primary prevention strategies, including family support services, designed to assist families in Senate File 2488, p. 4 establishing healthy, successful futures. b. Tailored early intervention strategies for children and families to ensure long-term well-being, including economic self-sufficiency. c. Ongoing family and community resources for children and families to address the root causes of child abuse and neglect and enhance protective factors. d. Specific service components including early childhood services, evidence-based family support services, and community resources. 4. To the extent funding is available, the department shall do all of the following to develop and administer the ECFS system and carry out the departmentâs duties under this chapter: a. Plan, establish, and maintain primary prevention strategies, early intervention strategies, and ongoing family and community resources. b. (1) Develop an early childhood and family services state plan that is consistent with the departmentâs agency strategic plan adopted pursuant to section 8E.204, and the state health improvement plan developed under section 217.17. (2) When developing the ECFS state plan, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Collaborate with stakeholders including but not limited to experienced public health and medical providers, law enforcement, educators, the early childhood Iowa state board, the early childhood Iowa area boards, and organizations that represent populations including but not limited to children to be served by the ECFS system. (b) Publish the proposed ECFS state plan on the departmentâs internet site and allow the public to review and comment on the proposed ECFS state plan prior to adoption. c. Administer the ECFS system in each ECFS district based on early childhood and family services district plans. d. Develop ECFS district plans in collaboration with ECFS system partners and stakeholders. e. Establish ECFS district advisory councils pursuant to section 234A.3. f. Coordinate administration of each ECFS district plan with Senate File 2488, p. 5 federal and state resources. g. Enter into contracts as necessary to perform activities, and provide services, supports, and other resources in accordance with each ECFS district plan. h. Coordinate district activities with other state agencies and state-funded initiatives that support positive outcomes for children and families. i. Administer and distribute federal aid received, and state appropriations, grants, and other moneys deposited into the early childhood and family services system fund. j. Oversee, provide technical assistance to, and monitor department contractors to ensure compliance with ECFS district plans. k. Establish and maintain data collection and management information systems to identify, collect, and analyze service outcomes and performance data to address the needs of clients, providers, the department, and ECFS system programs. l. Collect, maintain, monitor, analyze, and utilize information including but not limited to ECFS client records and programmatic, state, and national data, engage in studies and analyses, and gather relevant statistics to understand emerging needs and effectively deploy information, resources, and technical assistance in response. m. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this chapter. n. Take any other necessary actions to execute the departmentâs duties under this chapter or maintain compliance with federal requirements. 5. The department may do all of the following to develop and administer the ECFS system: a. Cooperate with any state agency, political subdivision, or federal governmental agency to apply for grants. b. Solicit and accept for use any gift of money, by will or otherwise, and any grant of money or services from the federal government, the state, a political subdivision of the state or federal government, or a private source. Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 234A.3 Early childhood and family services district advisory councils. 1. The department shall establish an early childhood Senate File 2488, p. 6 and family services district advisory council in each ECFS district. The department shall develop policies and procedures for the operational functions of each ECFS district advisory council. 2. An ECFS district advisory council shall consist of ten members appointed by the department. Individuals eligible for appointment include but are not limited to all of the following: a. Elected public officials who currently hold office within the ECFS district. b. Individuals who have experience or expertise related to health, education, domestic assault response, abuse response, or community-based child abuse prevention. c. Individuals who are representative of the populations served in the ECFS district advisory councilâs ECFS district. d. Individuals who represent the faith community or community partners in the ECFS district advisory councilâs ECFS district. 3. An ECFS district advisory council shall do all of the following: a. Identify opportunities and address challenges based on updates received from the department relating to the implementation of the ECFS district plan for the ECFS district advisory councilâs ECFS district. b. Provide feedback to the department while the department is developing ECFS system policies. c. Advise the department on how to best provide families access to primary prevention strategies, early intervention strategies, and ongoing family and community resources throughout the ECFS district advisory councilâs ECFS district. 4. An ECFS district advisory council shall perform the duties required under this section regardless of whether any seat on the ECFS district advisory council is vacant. Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 234A.4 Data collection and use. 1. The department shall perform all of the following actions related to ECFS system data: a. (1) Collect, maintain, monitor, analyze, and utilize data, including but not limited to child welfare data, Medicaid data, ECFS system data, and other data depicting the status of Senate File 2488, p. 7 children and families in the state, as necessary to issue cost estimates for serving populations, make and receive payments, conduct operations, and perform ECFS system activities. (2) When performing duties under this paragraph, the department shall maintain compliance with applicable federal and state privacy laws to ensure the confidentiality and integrity of individually identifiable data. (3) The department shall periodically assess the status of the departmentâs compliance with subparagraph (2) to ensure that data collected and maintained by the department under this paragraph is protected. b. To the extent possible, establish a record for each individual receiving publicly funded ECFS system services. Each record established under this paragraph shall include a unique client identifier for the purposes of identifying and tracking the individualâs record. c. Consult with department contractors and other ECFS system stakeholders on an ongoing basis relating to the administration of the ECFS system, including but not limited to reviewing trends and outcomes as indicators for improving or modifying administration of the ECFS system. d. Engage with entities that maintain information the department is required to collect pursuant to this section to integrate data relating to individuals receiving ECFS system services. e. Engage with entities that maintain general population data relating to the ECFS system to develop action plans, create projections relating to a populationâs ECFS system needs, develop ECFS system policies, and otherwise perform activities as necessary to support families in achieving a healthy, successful future. 2. The department shall ensure that public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals that operate within the ECFS system use uniform methods to maintain statistical information relating to ECFS system outcomes and performance. Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 234A.5 Healthy families programs ââ HOPES-HFI program. 1. The department may establish the HOPES-HFI program to provide services to families and children during a childâs Senate File 2488, p. 8 prenatal through preschool years. If established, the HOPES-HFI program shall do all of the following: a. Promote optimal child health and development. b. Improve family coping skills and functioning. c. Promote positive parenting skills and intrafamilial interaction. d. Prevent child abuse, child neglect, infant mortality, and infant morbidity. 2. The department shall administer the HOPES-HFI program, in whole or in part, by contracting with local organizations that use evidence-based home visiting models. Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 234A.6 Early childhood and family services system fund. 1. An early childhood and family services system fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the department and consisting of any moneys appropriated to the department for the ECFS system fundâs purposes by the general assembly and any other moneys available and obtained or accepted by the department for deposit in the ECFS system fund. The ECFS system fund shall be used to implement and administer the ECFS system. 2. Moneys in the ECFS system fund are appropriated to the department for the purposes of implementing and administering the ECFS system. 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. 4. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the ECFS system fund shall be credited to the ECFS system fund. Sec. 7. REPEAL. Section 135.106, Code 2026, is repealed. Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. The section of this division of this Act enacting section 234A.6, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. DIVISION II DECATEGORIZATION INITIATIVE Sec. 9. Section 235.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: Senate File 2488, p. 9 2. Membership. The department may authorize the governance boards of decategorization of child welfare and juvenile justice funding projects established under section 232.188 to appoint the transition committee membership and may utilize the boundaries of decategorization projects to establish the service areas for transition committees. The committee A committeeâs membership may include but is not limited to department staff involved with foster care, child welfare, and adult services, juvenile court services staff, staff involved with county general assistance or emergency relief under chapter 251 or 252 , school district and area education agency staff involved with special education, and a childâs court appointed special advocate, guardian ad litem, service providers, and other persons knowledgeable about the child. Sec. 10. Section 237A.1, subsection 2, paragraph j, subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended by striking the subparagraph. Sec. 11. Section 249A.26, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 12. Section 256I.4, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 13. REPEAL. Section 232.188, Code 2026, is repealed. Sec. 14. DECATEGORIZATION FUNDING AND INITIATIVES. 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires: a. âCarryover fundingâ means unobligated or unencumbered moneys described in section 232.188, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ, Code 2026, at the close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. b. âDecategorization initiativeâ means the services and activities funded through a funding pool. c. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human services. d. âFundingâ means moneys transferred to and remaining in a funding pool at the close of the fiscal year that began July 1, 2025, and that consist of any of the following: (1) Moneys appropriated by the general assembly and designated for a decategorization initiative. (2) Moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the Senate File 2488, p. 10 department for child welfare and juvenile justice services and designated for a decategorization initiative by the department. (3) Moneys appropriated to juvenile court services for juvenile justice programs and designated for a decategorization initiative. (4) Carryover funding. e. âFunding poolâ means the same as defined in section 232.188, Code 2026. f. âGovernance boardâ means the same as defined in section 232.188, Code 2026. 2. a. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funding that consists of moneys designated for decategorization initiatives and transferred to a funding pool by the department that remains in a funding pool at the close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, that has been encumbered or obligated by the governance board for a decategorization initiative or by contract beyond the end of that fiscal year, shall remain available for expenditure to ensure continuation of such decategorization initiative or contract until the close of the succeeding fiscal year, unless otherwise determined by the department under subsection 5. b. Any encumbered or obligated moneys remaining in a funding pool as specified in paragraph âaâ at the close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2026, which are not encumbered or obligated by the department as determined under subsection 5 shall be transferred and appropriated to the department. 3. a. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, juvenile court services shall terminate all decategorization initiative contracts funded through moneys designated for a decategorization initiative and transferred to a funding pool by juvenile court services at the close of the fiscal year that began July 1, 2025, and shall not renew or extend such contracts. b. Moneys encumbered or obligated under a contract terminated under this subsection that remain in a funding pool at the close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, shall be transferred and appropriated to juvenile court services. 4. a. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, moneys that remain in a funding pool at the end of Senate File 2488, p. 11 the fiscal year that began July 1, 2025, that are unencumbered or unobligated by the governance board for a decategorization initiative or by contract at the close of the fiscal year, shall be transferred and appropriated to the department and juvenile court services proportionately based on the percentage of moneys designated for decategorization initiatives and transferred to funding pools by each entity for each fiscal year for the fiscal period beginning July 1, 2020, and ending June 30, 2026. b. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary including section 8.33, moneys transferred and appropriated to the department and juvenile court services under this subsection shall not revert but shall remain available to those entities to be used for child welfare and juvenile justice services until expended. 5. a. With input from appropriate stakeholders, the department shall identify each contract funded through a funding pool impacted by this division of this Act. b. The department shall evaluate each contract identified under paragraph âaâ to determine the following: (1) If termination is permitted by the terms of a contract being evaluated, whether the department should exercise the option to terminate the contract by June 30, 2026, or continue the contract until the end of the current contract term. (2) If termination is not permitted by the terms of the contract, whether the contract should be renewed or extended by the department at the end of the current contract term. (3) Whether the department should assume responsibility for a contract for the remainder of the current term of the contract, for the term of the contract if the contract is renewed, or for the term of the contract if the contract is extended to avoid service interruption. c. Unless otherwise provided under this section, a governance board or other entity shall not execute a contract for a decategorization initiative if the contract is funded through moneys in a funding pool after the effective date of this section of this division of this Act, or if the term of the contract extends beyond, or the deliverables under the contract would be provided after, June 30, 2027. Senate File 2488, p. 12 Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATE. The section of this division of this Act related to decategorization funding and initiatives, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. Sec. 16. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The section of this division of this Act related to decategorization funding and initiatives applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. DIVISION III CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION PROGRAM Sec. 17. Section 144.13A, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. Ten dollars of each registration fee is appropriated and shall be used for primary and secondary child abuse prevention programs pursuant to section 235A.1 , and ten dollars of each registration fee is appropriated and shall be used for the congenital and inherited disorders central registry established pursuant to section 136A.6 . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this paragraph that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year, and shall not be transferred, used, obligated, appropriated, or otherwise encumbered except as provided in this paragraph. Sec. 18. Section 422.12K, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 422.12K Income tax checkoff for child abuse prevention program fund . 1. A person who files an individual or a joint income tax return with the department of revenue under section 422.13 may designate one dollar or more to be paid to the child abuse prevention program early childhood and family services system fund created in section 235A.2 234A.6, to be used for the purpose of child abuse prevention . If the refund due on the return or the payment remitted with the return is insufficient to pay the additional amount designated by the taxpayer to the child abuse prevention program early childhood and family services system fund, the amount designated shall be reduced to the remaining amount remitted with the return. The designation of a contribution to the child abuse prevention program early Senate File 2488, p. 13 childhood and family services system fund under this section is irrevocable. 2. The director of revenue shall draft the income tax form to allow the designation of contributions to the child abuse prevention program early childhood and family services system fund on the tax return. The department of revenue, on or before January 31, shall transfer the total amount designated on the tax return forms due in the preceding calendar year to the child abuse prevention program early childhood and family services system fund. However, before a checkoff pursuant to this section shall be permitted, all liabilities on the books of the department and accounts identified as owing under section 421.65 shall be satisfied. 3. The department of health and human services may authorize payment of moneys from the child abuse prevention program early childhood and family services system fund for the purpose of child abuse prevention in accordance with section 235A.2 234A.6 . 4. The department of revenue shall adopt rules to administer this section . 5. This section is subject to repeal under section 422.12E . Sec. 19. REPEAL. Sections 235A.1, 235A.2, and 235A.3, Code 2026, are repealed. Sec. 20. CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION PROGRAM FUND ââ TRANSFER OF MONEYS. Any unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining in the child abuse prevention program fund created in section 235A.2, on June 30, 2026, shall be transferred to the early childhood and family services system fund created in section 234A.6, as enacted in this Act. Sec. 21. CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION PROGRAM ââ REVIEW OF CONTRACTS IMPACTED BY TRANSITION TO THE EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SERVICES SYSTEM. With input from appropriate stakeholders, the department shall review the child abuse prevention programâs contract for program administration and each grant project funded through the child abuse prevention program for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, impacted by this division of this Act. The department shall work with the child abuse prevention programâs program administrator, local child abuse stakeholders, and Senate File 2488, p. 14 grant project recipients to transition the funding and child abuse prevention administration and service delivery to the early childhood and family services system established in division I of this Act. Sec. 22. EFFECTIVE DATE. The section of this division of this Act relating to the review of contracts impacted by the transition of the child abuse prevention program to the early childhood and family services system, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. Sec. 23. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The section of this division of this Act relating to the review of contracts impacted by the transition of the child abuse prevention program to the early childhood and family services system applies retroactively to July 1, 2025. DIVISION IV EARLY CHILDHOOD IOWA INITIATIVE ââ EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SERVICES Sec. 24. EARLY CHILDHOOD IOWA INITIATIVE ââ EARLY CHILDHOOD AND FAMILY SERVICES. 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires: a. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human services. b. âEarly childhood Iowa areaâ means the same as defined in section 256I.1. c. âEarly childhood Iowa area boardâ means the same as defined in section 256I.1. d. âEarly childhood Iowa initiativeâ means the same as described in section 256I.2. e. âECFS systemâ means the same as defined in section 234A.1, as enacted in division I of this Act. 2. If the department receives a request from an early childhood Iowa area board to transition administration of home visiting services to the ECFS system, the department shall develop and implement a plan to facilitate the transfer. The departmentâs plan shall, at a minimum, include all of the following: a. With input from appropriate stakeholders, the department shall identify each current home visiting services contract Senate File 2488, p. 15 executed by the early childhood Iowa area board requesting the transfer of administration of home visiting services. The early childhood Iowa area board shall, if permitted by the terms of a contract, exercise the option to terminate the contract. If a contract does not permit early termination, the contract shall be terminated at the end of the current term of the contract. A contract identified under this paragraph shall not be renewed or extended at the end of the current contract term. b. All debts, claims, or other liabilities owed to an early childhood Iowa area board, or the boardâs early childhood Iowa area, due to home visiting services provided or rendered pursuant to chapter 256I prior to transfer of administration of home visiting services to the ECFS system shall remain due and owing after administration of home visiting services is transferred to the ECFS system. Each fiscal agent contracted with an early childhood Iowa area board shall collect such outstanding debts, claims, or other liabilities. c. An early childhood Iowa area board or an agent of an early childhood Iowa area board shall not enter into, renew, or extend a home visiting services contract related to the early childhood Iowa initiative or related activities if the term of the contract extends past, or the deliverables under the contract would be provided after, the date administration of the home visiting services is transferred to the ECFS system. d. The department shall ensure that individuals currently receiving home visiting services provided through the early childhood Iowa initiative by the early childhood Iowa area board requesting the transfer of administration of home visiting services have uninterrupted continuity of care during the transition. e. The department shall maintain ongoing communication with, and provide a means to receive input from, the early childhood Iowa area board requesting the transfer of administration of home visiting services during the selection process for home visiting services providers in the early childhood Iowa area boardâs early childhood Iowa area. The department shall collaborate with the director of the early childhood Iowa area board when selecting a home visiting Senate File 2488, p. 16 services provider. The department shall ensure that each contract the department enters into for home visiting services requires that the contracted home visiting services provider inform the early childhood Iowa area board that the home visiting services provider will provide home visiting services in the early childhood Iowa area boardâs early childhood Iowa area. 3. During and after the transfer of administration of home visiting services to the ECFS system, and contingent upon the departmentâs receipt of additional federal funds for home visiting services pursuant to the Social Security Act, Tit. IV-E, the department shall annually redistribute among all early childhood Iowa areas that made a request under subsection 2 the following percentages of the additional federal funds received for coordination of early childhood services for children from age zero through age five: a. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2028, twenty-five percent. b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, and ending June 30, 2029, fifteen percent. c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, and ending June 30, 2030, five percent. DIVISION V EARLY CHILDHOOD IOWA INTERIM STUDY COMMITTEE Sec. 25. LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL ââ EARLY CHILDHOOD IOWA INTERIM STUDY COMMITTEE. 1. The legislative council shall convene a study committee during the 2026 legislative interim to review the most efficient means to transition home visiting services offered through an early childhood Iowa area, as that term is defined in section 256I.1, to another system based on districts created by the department of health and human services and to implement the transition with minimal disruption to home visitation services. At a minimum, the study committee shall review all of the following: a. The financial and logistical consequences to the early childhood Iowa system and home visitation services. b. The effects on statewide access to services currently provided through early childhood Iowa, including but not Senate File 2488, p. 17 limited to the quality of services and the coordination between providers and the department. c. The impact on rural and underserved communities. d. Possible courses of action to transition home visitation services to ensure the early childhood Iowa system remains viable and effective in the long term. 2. a. The study committeeâs voting members shall consist of the following: (1) Two members of the senate appointed by the senate majority leader. (2) One member of the senate appointed by the senate minority leader. (3) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the house majority leader. (4) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the house minority leader. b. The study committeeâs nonvoting members shall consist of the following: (1) Two members of the association of early childhood Iowa area boards and advocates appointed by the association of early childhood Iowa area boards and advocates. (2) Two early childhood Iowa stakeholders appointed by the association of early childhood Iowa area boards and advocates. (3) Two persons with relevant expertise appointed by the association of early childhood Iowa area boards and advocates. (4) Two representatives of the department of health and human services. (5) One representative of the department of education. (6) One representative of the department of workforce development. (7) One representative of the economic development authority. 3. The department of health and human services shall cooperate with any formal request for data from the study committee. All personal identifying information shall be redacted prior to submitting the requested data to the study committee. 4. The study committee shall submit a final report with the study committeeâs findings and recommendations to the general Senate File 2488, p. 18 assembly no later than January 8, 2027. In lieu of a final report, the study committee may submit a bill draft to the general assembly with proposed changes to the Code based on the study committeeâs findings. DIVISION VI CONFORMING CHANGES Sec. 26. Section 232.69, subsection 1, paragraph b, subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (5) An employee or operator of a licensed child care center, registered child development home, head start program, family development and self-sufficiency grant program under section 216A.107 , or healthy opportunities for parents to experience success â healthy families Iowa program under section 135.106 234A.5 . Sec. 27. Section 237A.30, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. The department shall work with the early childhood Iowa program established in section 256I.5 in designing and implementing implement a voluntary quality rating system for each provider type of child care facility. Sec. 28. Section 256I.13, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. In order to implement the legislative intent stated in sections 135.106 and section 256I.9 , that priority for family support program funding be given to programs using evidence-based or promising models for family support, it is the intent of the general assembly that ninety percent of state funds expended for family support programs shall be used for evidence-based or promising program models. The remaining ten percent of funds may be used for innovative program models that do not yet meet the definition of evidence-based or promising programs. DIVISION VII CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVES Sec. 29. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVES. The Code editor is directed to do all of the following: 1. Make changes in any Code sections amended or enacted by any other Act to correspond with the changes made in this Act if there appears to be no doubt as to the proper method of Senate File 2488, p. 19 making the changes and the changes would not be contrary to or inconsistent with the purposes of this Act or any other Act. 2. Correct internal references in the Code and in enacted legislation as necessary due to the enactment of this Act. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2488, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor